Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.592

Employee ownership program—Administration—Commission.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 2047-S.SL) ***

(1) The Washington employee ownership commission is hereby created to exercise the powers in developing and supervising the program created in RCW 43.330.590.

(2) The commission shall consist of:

(a) One member from each of the two major caucuses of the house of representatives to be appointed by the speaker of the house and one member from each of the two major caucuses of the senate to be appointed by the president of the senate. The initial term shall be two years; and

(b) The following members appointed by the governor:

(i) Five members who represent the private sector or professional organizations as follows:

(A) One representative of a worker cooperative business. The initial term shall be four years;

(B) One representative of an employee stock ownership plan business. The initial term shall be four years;

(C) One representative from a statewide business association. The initial term shall be two years;

(D) One economic development expert, from the private sector, with employee ownership knowledge and experience. The initial term shall be four years; and

(E) One representative from a financial institution with expertise in assisting businesses transitioning into an employee ownership structure. The initial term shall be two years; and

(ii) Two members who represent the public sector as follows:

(A) One economic development expert, from the public sector. The initial term shall be four years; and

(B) One representative from the department of commerce, who will chair the first meeting prior to the election of the chair. The initial term shall be four years.

(3) After the initial term of appointment, all members shall serve terms of four years and shall hold office until successors are appointed.

(4) The commission shall be led by a chair selected and voted on by members of the commission. The chair shall serve a one-year term but may serve more than one term if selected to do so by members of the commission.

(5) The commission shall develop, in consultation with the director, rules and guidelines to administer the program. Rules and guidelines for the administration of the program must be included in the first report to the legislature required in RCW 43.330.590.

(6) Before making any appointments to the commission, the governor must seek nominations from recognized organizations that represent the entities or interests identified in this section. The governor must select appointees to represent private sector industries from a list of three nominations provided by the trade associations representing the industry, unless no names are put forth by the trade associations.

(7) The commission shall conduct market research for the purposes of, or to support, a future application to the federal government for a program to assist in the purchase of an interest in an employee stock ownership plan qualifying under section 401 of the internal revenue code, worker cooperative, or related broad-based employee ownership vehicle.

(8) For purposes of this section, a "professional organization" includes an entity whose members are engaged in a particular lawful vocation, occupation, or field of activity of a specialized nature including, but not limited to, associations, boards, educational institutions, and nonprofit organizations.

[ 2023 c 392 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2023 c 392: See notes following RCW 43.330.590.